Utah statutes.
58-76-603.   Seal -- Authorized use.

A professional geologist may only affix the licensee's seal to a geologic map, cross-section, sketch, drawing, plan, or report if the geologic map, cross-section, sketch, drawing, plan, or report:

(1)  was personally prepared by the licensee;

(2)  was prepared by an employee, subordinate, associate, or drafter under the supervision of a licensee, provided the licensee or a principal affixing his seal assumes responsibility;

(3)  was prepared by a licensed professional geologist in this state or any other state provided:

(a)  the licensee in this state affixing the seal performs a thorough review of all work for compliance with all applicable laws and rules and the standards of the profession; and

(b)  makes any necessary corrections before submitting the final plan, specification, or report:

(i)  to a public authority; or

(ii)  to a client who has contracted with a professional geologist for the geologic map, cross-section, or report to be complete and final;

(4)  was prepared in part by a licensed professional geologist in this state or any other state provided:

(a)  the licensee in this state clearly identifies that portion of the geologic map, cross-section, or report for which the licensee is responsible;

(b)  the licensee in this state affixing the seal performs a thorough review of that portion of the geologic map, cross-section, or report for which the licensee is responsible for compliance with the standards of the profession; and

(c)  makes any necessary corrections before submitting the final geologic map, cross-section, or report for which the licensee is responsible:

(i)  to a public authority; or

(ii)  to a client who has contracted with a professional geologist for the geologic map, cross-section, or report to be complete and final;

(5)  was prepared by a person exempt from licensure as a professional geologist provided that:

(a)  the licensee in this state affixing the seal performs a thorough review for compliance with all applicable laws and rules and the standards of the profession; and

(b)  makes any necessary corrections before submitting the final geologic map, cross-section, or report:

(i)  to a public authority; or

(ii)  to a client who has contracted with a professional geologist for the geologic map, cross-section, or report to be complete and final; or

(6)  meets any additional requirements established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board.

